Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,116.02
Instream appropriation; use of stored water; funding.

If the Chief Water Officer determines that instream flow needs can be met through the use of stored water in new storage facilities after a study conducted under section 46-2,116.01, the applicant may request financial assistance for the construction of necessary storage facilities from the Nebraska Resources Development Fund. The cost of the project may be shared with any other users of the stored water.

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 772, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 149;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 133.